California, session 20252026, SB958.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 21081.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21081.5.SECTION 1. Section 21080.82 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.82. (a) For purposes of this division, the environmental impacts of a project that are associated with increased building height alone, including, but not limited to, air circulation, noise and light refraction or reflection, or the potential to attract wildlife, or geotechnical or hydrological effects, shall not be considered significant impacts on the environment if the project meets all of the following conditions:(1) The use and density of the project is otherwise analyzed in a certified environmental impact report.(2) The project is on a previously graded infill site.(3) There are no sensitive biological resources physically present on the site.(4) The project is not an industrial use project.(5) For a project that is proposed to be constructed on a site that is greater than 40 acres that has an estimated construction valuation that exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) and that is subject to a project-specific environmental impact report, the project shall create high-wage, highly-skilled jobs that pay prevailing wages and living wages, employ a skilled and trained workforce, and provide construction jobs and permanent jobs for Californians.(b) For purposes of this section, “jobs that pay prevailing wages” means that construction workers employed in the execution of the project will receive at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.